California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
All criteria, guidelines, and policies developed by the California Workforce Development Board for the administration of the initiative shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 41.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Prison to Employment Program [14040. - 14042.]

14040.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Earn and learn” has the same meaning as in subdivision (q) of Section 14005.

(b) “Justice involved” refers to individuals who are on parole, probation, mandatory supervision, or postrelease community supervision and are supervised by, or are under the jurisdiction of, a county or the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.

(c) “Prison to employment regional partnership” or “regional partnership” means a partnership established to develop a regional plan that coordinates reentry and workforce services in each of the state’s 14 workforce regions
 established pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (Public Law 113-128), so that the formerly incarcerated and other justice-involved individuals in these regions can find and retain employment. Partners in a regional partnership shall include local workforce development boards, the California Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, Division of Adult Parole Operations, community-based organizations that serve the formerly incarcerated and other justice-involved individuals, and reentry service providers. Partners may include other stakeholders, as specified by the board.

(d) “Prison to employment regional plan” or “regional plan” is the plan developed by a regional partnership to coordinate reentry and workforce services in each of the state’s 14 workforce regions. The prison to employment regional plan is a component of each federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act regional workforce plan.

(e) “Supportive services” are services necessary to enable an individual to successfully participate in, or receive, workforce, education, and other related services authorized under subdivision (c) of Section 1234.3 of the Penal Code, Section 14035 of this code, as well as the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and its corresponding regulations.

(f) “Workforce, education, and related services” include services authorized under subdivision (c) of Section 1234.3 of the Penal Code, Section 14035 of this code, as well the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and its corresponding regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 42.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14041.

The board shall administer a prison to employment program pursuant to this article and shall award grants for the following purposes:

(a) The development of regional partnerships and regional plans to provide and coordinate the necessary workforce, education, and related services that formerly incarcerated and other justice-involved individuals need to secure and retain employment and reduce the chances of recidivism.

(b) The implementation of the regional plans, including the provision of workforce, education, and related services and supportive services outlined in these regional plans.

(c) The provision of earn and learn opportunities
 for formerly incarcerated and other justice-involved individuals participating in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 53, Sec. 42.   (SB 866)   Effective June 27, 2018.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14042.

(a) Prior to awarding grants pursuant to Section 14041, the board shall develop and adopt guidelines and policies for the program, including, but not limited to, required regional plan content, required and optional regional plan partners, required activities of the regional partnerships, and guidelines for the allocation of grants, including planning guidance, timelines, and selection criteria for the distribution and evaluation of grant awards. The board shall consider factors including, but not limited to, the need for workforce services for the formerly incarcerated and justice-involved individuals in each region, the size of post-release populations, and the recidivism rate in each region.

(b) The board shall ensure that the guidelines developed pursuant to
 subdivision (a) are consistent with paragraph (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 1234.2 of, and subdivision (b) and paragraph (1) of subdivision (e) of Section 1234.3 of, the Penal Code, and Section 14031 of, and paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) and paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (d) of Section 14032 of, this code.

(c) Grants made pursuant to this article shall be evaluated using criteria consistent with those set forth in subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, of Sections 14033. The board may utilize additional criteria to evaluate these grants. If additional grant funds are appropriated to the California Workforce Development Board for the Prison to Employment program on or after July 1, 2025, the California Workforce Development Board shall produce a report evaluating grant program outcomes on the timeline prescribed in subdivision (t) of Section 14013.

(d) (1) The criteria guidelines, and policies shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(2) The board shall make the criteria, guidelines, and policies available to the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 83, Sec. 25.   (SB 171)   Effective July 13, 2026.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Social Entrepreneurs for Economic Development Initiative [14106. - 14109.]

14106.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Numerous studies have indicated the significant economic contributions of immigrants to this state and the nation as a whole. Businesses launched by immigrant entrepreneurs create millions of jobs, generate billions of dollars in revenue, and help revitalize communities.

(b) California has the highest concentration of immigrant business owners in the nation. From 2007 to 2011, immigrants founded 44 percent of new businesses in the state. In 2016, undocumented immigrant entrepreneurs generated over $3 billion in business income in California.

(c) In 2017, individuals eligible for
 Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) earned over $23 billion in income and paid almost $1.8 billion in state and local taxes; more than 43,000 were entrepreneurs, providing jobs and supporting local economies. Individuals granted Temporary Protected Status (TPS) earned over $7 billion in 2017, and paid more than $890 million in federal taxes and over $650 million in state and local taxes.

(d) Individuals who are not United States citizens or lawful permanent residents, or who are limited English proficient, face multiple impediments that may prevent them from securing and maintaining gainful employment. For example, due to actions at the federal level, DACA and TPS recipients, who are vital members of our communities and spark economic development, have been deprived of or are at risk of being denied certain federal protections, which will result in economic hardship for them and their families.

(e) It is in the best interest of the State of California to enable these individuals to continue contributing to the economic vibrancy of this state, by supporting entrepreneurial opportunities to start and grow small businesses that will open up paths to economic self-sufficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 10.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.5.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “California Workforce Development Board” or “board” means the California Workforce Development Board established pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 14010).

(b) “SEED Initiative” or “SEED” means the Social Entrepreneurs for Economic Development Initiative.

(c) “Target populations” means either of the following:

(1) Individuals with limited English proficiency, regardless of immigration or citizenship status.

(2) Individuals who are neither United States citizens nor lawful permanent residents, which includes, but is not limited to, individuals who have been granted Deferred Action for Childhood Arrivals (DACA) or Temporary Protected Status (TPS) under federal law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 10.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14107.

(a) This article establishes the Social Entrepreneurs for Economic Development Initiative, to be administered by the California Workforce Development Board.

(b) The SEED Initiative is aimed at economically disadvantaged groups who face significant barriers to employment, specifically individuals with limited English proficiency, or individuals who are neither United States citizens nor lawful permanent residents. While this includes individuals who have been granted DACA or TPS, the SEED Initiative is open to all individuals in the target populations, including but not limited to other immigrants, refugees and asylees, and United States citizens.

(c) The purpose of the SEED
 Initiative is to support burgeoning entrepreneurship of individuals in SEED target populations, which will also increase the economic diversity of the state and help spur business innovation. Efforts funded under SEED are intended to supplement and be aligned with the broader workforce and education system in California.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to allow persons who are not lawfully present in the United States, as members of the SEED target populations, to participate in and benefit from the SEED Initiative, and this section is therefore enacted pursuant to Section 1621(d) of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 10.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14108.

(a) The SEED Initiative shall provide entrepreneurial training to individuals from the target populations and award microgrants to support them in launching or maintaining a small business in California.

(b) Eligible uses of SEED funds include, but are not limited to, the development and implementation of the following SEED program components for any target population: an immigrant entrepreneurship training curriculum; microgrants and technical assistance to support small business development aimed at addressing a social problem or meeting a community need; community education and outreach about SEED; program evaluation; and program administration.

(c) The board shall administer
 the SEED Initiative through nonprofit community-based organizations that will develop and implement SEED program components.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 14, Sec. 10.   (AB 82)   Effective June 29, 2020.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14109.

For purposes of implementing the SEED Initiative, no entity or person shall seek information that is unnecessary to determine eligibility, including whether the individual is unlawfully present in the United States. Information that may be collected from individuals participating in the SEED Initiative shall not constitute a record subject to disclosure under Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 423.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Section 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Workforce Wellness Centers [14120. - 14121.]

14120.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Workplace shootings, especially in high-stress industries such as transit agencies, have resulted in numerous deaths across California.

(b) On May 26, 2021, a Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority (VTA) employee entered the Guadalupe rail yard and began a shooting rampage that killed nine of his coworkers before taking his own life. This shooting is the deadliest mass shooting in the history of the San Francisco Bay area. The shooting occurred in locations integral to the operation of the light rail service, particularly adjacent to the Operational Control Center
 room and the entry to the entire second floor of the administration center, resulting in a 13-week shut down of rail services.

(c) In response, the Legislature appropriated $20,000,000 to help the VTA and workers recover from the tragedy. The VTA was required by the state to create a joint labor management committee to provide recommendations for the use of those funds, including establishing a worker wellness center where workers and their families could receive onsite support and assistance, including peer-to-peer and trauma counseling and other mental health services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   (SB 1294)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14121.

(a) The board, or a research institution under contract with the board, the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority, and the California Health and Human Services Agency, shall do all of the following:

(1) Draft a model plan for the development and implementation of a worker wellness center that provides services and support to transit workers and their families.

(2) Develop a plan to encourage the establishment of worker wellness center demonstration sites statewide in transit authorities to reduce workplace violence.
 The plan shall include, but is not limited to:

(A) Analyzing the effectiveness of the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority’s wellness center.

(B) Identifying interventions that promote employee wellness, prevention and early intervention, and peer-to-peer support.

(C) Examining violence prevention tactics in the workplace, including, but not limited to, developing a worker reporting structure that focuses on prevention and early intervention and ways to foster peer
 reporting.

(D) Identifying no less than three transit authority locations in California where the model plan could be utilized to reduce workplace violence and increase worker wellness interventions.

(E) Identifying other high-stress industries that could benefit from utilizing workplace violence prevention tactics and worker wellness interventions.

(b) In developing the plans described in paragraphs
 (1) and (2) of subdivision (a), the
 board, or a research institution under contract with the board, shall consider all of the following:

(1) Funding sustainability, including the prospects for securing federal matching funds and billing private insurers.

(2) Linkages to county behavioral health services agencies.

(3) Ways to streamline workers’ compensation claims resulting from workplace violence.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the Santa Clara Valley Transportation Authority shall provide the board, or a research institution under contract with the board, with data and outcomes from its wellness center that are necessary for the evaluation required by this section.

(2) Data and outcomes provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be aggregated and deidentified in a manner that prevents the identification of an individual who is a subject of that information.

(d) (1) Pursuant to Section
 9795 of the Government Code, the board, or a research institution under contract with the board, shall prepare and send to the Legislature a report on the results of its evaluation conducted and plans developed pursuant to this section no later than two years following an appropriation for purposes of implementing this article.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed by this subdivision is inoperative on January 1, 2028, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of
 the Government Code.

(e) The board shall consult with the Division of Occupational Safety and Health to ensure plans or proposals comply with and do not conflict with occupational safety and health laws and regulations.

(f) This article shall become operative only upon an appropriation by the Legislature in the Budget Act or another statute for the purposes of implementing this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 305, Sec. 1.   (SB 1294)   Effective January 1, 2023.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Local Service Delivery [14200. - 14246.]



  ARTICLE 1. Local Workforce Development Board [14200. - 14211.]

14200.

(a) The local chief elected officials in a local workforce development area shall form, pursuant to guidelines established by the Governor and the board, a local workforce development board to plan and oversee the workforce investment system.

(b) The Governor shall periodically certify one local board for each local area in the state, following the requirements of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.

(c) The Governor shall establish, through the California Workforce Development Board, standards for certification of high-performance local workforce development boards. The California Workforce Development Board shall, in consultation with representatives from local workforce
 development boards, initiate a stakeholder process to determine the appropriate measurable metrics and standards for high-performance certification. These standards shall be implemented on or before January 1, 2013, and the first certification of high-performance boards shall occur on or before July 1, 2013. Certification and recertification of each high-performance local workforce development board shall occur thereafter midway through the implementation of the local and regional plans required by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. In order to meet the standards for certification, a high-performance local workforce development board shall do all of the following:

(1) Consistently meet or exceed negotiated performance goals for all of the measures in each of the three federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 customer groups, which consist of adults, dislocated workers, and youth.

(2) Consistently meet the statutory requirements of this division.

(3) Develop and implement local policies and a local strategic plan that meets all of the following requirements:

(A) Meets all local and regional planning requirements specified under the federal Workforce Innovation and Development Act of 2014.

(B) Is consistent with the California Workforce Development Board State Plan.

(C) Describes the actions that the board shall take to implement local policies in furtherance of its goals.

(D) Serves as a written account of intended future courses of action aimed at achieving the specific goals of the local and state board
 within a specific timeframe.

(E) Explains what needs to be done, by whom, and when each action is required to occur in order to meet those goals.

(4) Demonstrate that the local planning process involves key stakeholders, including the major employers and industry groups in the relevant regional economy and organized labor.

(5) Demonstrate that the local planning process takes into account the entire workforce training pipeline for the relevant regional economy, including partners in K–12 education, career technical education, the community college system, other postsecondary institutions, and other local workforce development areas operating in the relevant regional economy.

(6) Demonstrate that the local planning process and plan are data driven, and
 that policy decisions at the local level are evidence based. Each high-performance local workforce development board shall use labor market data to develop and implement the local plan, taking care to steer resources into programs and services that are relevant to the needs of each workforce development area’s relevant regional labor market and high-wage industry sectors. Local workforce development areas shall demonstrate an evidence-based approach to policymaking by establishing performance benchmarks and targets to measure progress toward local goals and objectives.

(7) Demonstrate investment in workforce initiatives, and, specifically, training programs that promote skills development and career ladders relevant to the needs of each workforce investment area’s regional labor market and high-wage industry sectors.

(8) Establish a youth strategy aligned with the needs of each
 workforce investment area’s regional labor market and high-wage industry sectors.

(9) Establish a business service plan that integrates local business involvement with workforce initiatives. This plan at a minimum shall include all of the following:

(A) Efforts to partner with businesses to identify the workforce training and educational barriers to attract jobs in the relevant regional economy, existing skill gaps reducing the competitiveness of local businesses in the relevant regional economies, and potential emerging industries that would likely contribute to job growth in the relevant regional economy if investments were made for training and educational programs.

(B) An electronic system for both businesses and job seekers to communicate about job opportunities.

(C) A subcommittee of the local workforce development board that further develops and makes recommendations for the business service plan for each local workforce development board in an effort to increase employer involvement in the activities of the local workforce development board. The subcommittee members should be comprised of business representatives on the local workforce development board who represent both the leading industries and employers in the relevant regional economy and potential emerging sectors that have significant potential to contribute to job growth in the relevant regional economy if investments were made for training and educational programs.

(d) The Governor and the Legislature, as part of the annual budget process, in consultation with the California Workforce Development Board, shall annually reserve a portion of the 15-percent discretionary fund made
 available pursuant to the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 for the purpose of providing performance incentives to high-performance local workforce development boards. The remaining discretionary funds shall continue to be available for other discretionary purposes as provided for in the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014.

(e) Only a workforce development board that is certified as a high-performance local workforce development board by the California Workforce Development Board shall be eligible to receive any incentive money reserved for high-performance local workforce development boards, as described in subdivision (d). A board that is not certified as a high-performance local workforce development board shall not receive any portion of the money reserved for high-performance local workforce development boards, as described in subdivision (d).

(f) The California Workforce Development Board shall establish a policy for the allocation of incentive moneys to high-performance local workforce development boards.

(g) To the extent permitted by the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014, the California Workforce Development Board may consider the utilization of incentive grants, or direct assistance, or both, to local workforce development boards for the purposes of this section.

(h) There shall not be a requirement to set aside federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 funds for the purposes of subdivision (d), (e), (f), or (g) in years when the federal government significantly reduces the share of federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act of 2014 funds appropriated to the state for statewide discretionary purposes below the federal statutory amount of 15
 percent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 298.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14201.

Local workforce development boards shall be established in each local workforce development area of the state to assist the local chief elected official in planning, oversight, and evaluation of local workforce investment. The local board shall promote effective outcomes consistent with statewide goals, objectives, and negotiated local performance standards.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 19.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14202.

The Governor, in partnership with the board, shall establish criteria for use by chief elected officials in the local areas for appointment of members of the local boards. Such criteria shall require that, at a minimum, all of the following:

(a) A majority of the members of each local board shall be representatives of business in the local area, who:

(1) Are owners of businesses, chief executives or operating officers of businesses, or other business executives or employers with optimum policymaking or hiring authority.

(2) Represent businesses, including small businesses, or organizations
 representing businesses described in this subdivision, that provide employment opportunities that, at a minimum, include high-quality, work-relevant training and development in in-demand industry sectors or occupations in the local area.

(3) Are appointed from among individuals nominated by local business organizations and business trade associations.

(b) Not less than 20 percent of the members of each local board shall be representatives of the workforce within the local area, who:

(1) Shall include representatives of labor organizations, for a local area in which employees are represented by labor organizations, who have been nominated by local labor federations and these representatives shall amount to not less than 15 percent of local board membership, and be subject to the following:

(A) For a local area in which no employees are represented by such organizations, other representatives of employees shall be appointed to the board but any local board that appoints representatives of employees that are not nominated by local labor federations shall demonstrate that no employees are represented by such organizations in the local area. 

(B) Shall include a representative, who shall be a member of a labor organization or a training director, from a joint labor-management apprenticeship program, or if no such joint program exists in the area, such a representative of a state-approved apprenticeship program in the area, if such a program exists.

(2) May include representatives of community-based organizations that have demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing the employment needs of individuals
 with barriers to employment, including organizations that serve veterans or that provide or support competitive integrated employment for individuals with disabilities.

(3) May include representatives of organizations that have demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing the employment, training, or education needs of eligible youth, including representatives of organizations that serve out-of-school youth.

(c) Each local board shall include representatives of entities administering education and training activities in the local area, who:

(1) Shall include a representative of eligible providers administering adult education and literacy activities under Title II of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(2) Shall include a representative
 of institutions of higher education providing workforce investment activities, including community colleges.

(3) May include representatives of local educational agencies, and of community-based organizations with demonstrated experience and expertise in addressing the education or training needs of individuals with barriers to employment.

(d) Each local board shall include representatives of governmental and economic and community development entities serving the local area, who:

(1) Shall include a representative of economic and community development entities.

(2) Shall include an appropriate representative from the state employment service office under the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49 et seq.) serving the local area.

(3) Shall include an appropriate representative of the programs carried out under Title I of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 720 et seq.), other than Section 112 or Part C of that Title (29 U.S.C. Sec. 732, 741), serving the local area.

(4) May include representatives of philanthropic organizations serving the local area.

(e) Each local board may include such other individuals or representatives of entities as the chief elected official in the local area may determine to be appropriate.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 21.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14205.

The local board shall elect a chairperson for the local board from among the business representatives.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 630, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2007.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14206.

Consistent with the requirements of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, the local board shall do all of the following:

(a) In partnership with the chief elected official for the local area involved, develop and submit a local plan to the Governor that meets the requirements of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act. If the local area is part of a planning region that includes other local areas, the local board shall collaborate with the other local boards and chief elected officials from such other local areas in the preparation and submission of a regional plan as described in the Workforce and Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(b) In order to
 assist in the development and implementation of the local plan, the local board shall do all of the following:

(1) Carry out analyses of the economic conditions in the region, the needed knowledge and skills for the region, the workforce in the region, and workforce development activities, including education and training, in the region described in Section 3123(b)(1)(D) of Title 29 of the United States Code, and regularly update such information.

(2) Assist the Governor in developing the statewide workforce and labor market information system described in Section 15(e) of the Wagner-Peyser Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 49l–2(e)), specifically in the collection, analysis, and utilization of workforce and labor market information for the region.

(3) Conduct such other research, data collection, and analysis related to the
 workforce needs of the regional economy as the board, after receiving input from a wide array of stakeholders, determines to be necessary to carry out its functions.

(c) Convene local workforce development system stakeholders to assist in the development of the local plan under Section 3123 of Title 29 of the United States Code and in identifying nonfederal expertise and resources to leverage support for workforce development activities. The local board, including standing committees, may engage such stakeholders in carrying out the functions described in this subdivision.

(d) Lead efforts to engage with a diverse range of employers and with entities in the region involved to do all of the following:

(1) Promote business representation, particularly representatives with optimal policymaking or hiring authority from
 employers whose employment opportunities reflect existing and emerging employment opportunities in the region, on the local board.

(2) Develop effective linkages, including the use of intermediaries, with employers in the region to support employer utilization of the local workforce development system and to support local workforce investment activities.

(3) Ensure that workforce investment activities meet the needs of employers and support economic growth in the region, by enhancing communication, coordination, and collaboration among employers, economic development entities, and service providers.

(4) Develop and implement proven or promising strategies for meeting the employment and skill needs of workers and employers, like the establishment of industry and sector partnerships, that provide the skilled workforce
 needed by employers in the region, and that expand employment and career advancement opportunities for workforce development system participants in in-demand industry sectors or occupations.

(e) With representatives of secondary and postsecondary education programs, lead efforts in the local area to develop and implement career pathways within the local area by aligning the employment, training, education, and supportive services that are needed by adults and youth, particularly individuals with barriers to employment.

(f) Lead efforts in the local area to accomplish both of the following:

(1) Identify and promote proven and promising strategies and initiatives for meeting the needs of employers, and workers and jobseekers, including individuals with barriers to employment, in the local workforce development system,
 including providing physical and programmatic accessibility, in accordance with Section 3248 of Title 29 of the United States Code, if applicable, and applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), to the one-stop delivery system.

(2) Identify and disseminate information on proven and promising practices carried out in other local areas for meeting these needs.

(g) Develop strategies for using technology to maximize the accessibility and effectiveness of the local workforce development system for employers, and workers and jobseekers, by doing all of the following:

(1) Facilitating connections among the intake and case management information systems of the one-stop partner programs to support a comprehensive workforce development system in the local area.

(2) Facilitating access to services provided through the one-stop delivery system involved, including facilitating the access in remote areas.

(3) Identifying strategies for better meeting the needs of individuals with barriers to employment, including strategies that augment traditional service delivery, and increase access to services and programs of the one-stop delivery system, such as improving digital literacy skills.

(4) Leveraging resources and capacity within the local workforce development system, including resources and capacity for services for individuals with barriers to employment.

(h) In partnership with the chief elected official for the local area, shall conduct oversight for local youth workforce investment activities as required under
 the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, ensure the appropriate use and management of the funds as required under the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, and, for workforce development activities, ensure the appropriate use, management, and investment of funds to maximize performance outcomes as required under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act.

(i) Negotiate and reach agreement on local performance accountability measures, as described in Section 3141(c) of Title 29 of the United States Code, with the chief elected official and the Governor.

(j) Select and provide access to system operators, service providers, trainers, and educators, in a manner consistent with the requirements of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act and applicable state laws, including all of the following:

(1) Consistent with Section 3151(d) of Title 29 of the United States Code, and with the agreement of the chief elected official for the local area, designate or certify one-stop operators as described in Section 3151(d)(2)(A) of Title 29 of the United States Code and terminate for cause the eligibility of these operators.

(2) Consistent with Section 3153 of Title 29 of the United States Code, identify eligible providers of youth workforce investment activities in the local area by awarding grants or contracts on a competitive basis, except as provided in Section 3153(b) of Title 29 of the United States Code, based on the recommendations of the youth standing committee, if such a committee is established for the local area and terminate for cause the eligibility of these providers.

(3) Consistent with Section 3152 of Title 29 of the United States Code and paragraph (4)
 of subdivision (d) of Section 14020, identify eligible providers of training services in the local area.

(4) If the one-stop operator does not provide career services described in Section 3174(c)(2) of Title 29 of the United States Code in a local area, identify eligible providers of those career services in the local area by awarding contracts.

(5) Consistent with Section 3152 of Title 29 of the United States Code and paragraphs (2) and (3) of Section 3174(c) of Title 29 of the United States Code, work with the state to ensure there are sufficient numbers and types of providers of career services and training services, including eligible providers with expertise in assisting individuals with disabilities and eligible providers with expertise in assisting adults in need of adult education and literacy activities, serving the local area and providing the services involved in a
 manner that maximizes consumer choice, as well as providing opportunities that lead to competitive integrated employment for individuals with disabilities.

(k) Consistent with the requirements of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, coordinate activities with education and training providers in the local area, including providers of workforce development activities, providers of adult education and literacy activities under Title II of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, providers of career and technical education, as defined in Section 2302 of Title 20 of the United States Code, and local agencies administering plans under Title I of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 720 et seq.), other than Section 112 or Part C of that Title (29 U.S.C. Sec. 732, 741).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 25.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14207.

The local board, in order to carry out its functions:

(a) Shall prepare a budget for the purpose of carrying out the duties of the local board as specified under this section, subject to the approval of the local chief elected official.

(b) Shall direct the activities of the local board’s executive director.
